Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.040

Explanatory statements.

(1) Explanatory statements prepared by the attorney general under RCW 29A.32.070 (3) and (4) must be written in clear and concise language, avoiding legal and technical terms when possible. Statements are initiated by written request from the secretary of state, and must be filed with the secretary of state by the date provided in the request.

(2) When the explanatory statements for a measure initiated by petition are filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of the statements to the person proposing the measure and any others who have made written request for notification of the exact language of the statements. When the statements for a measure referred to the ballot by the legislature are filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of the statements to the presiding officer of the senate, the presiding officer of the house of representatives, the prime sponsor, and any others who have made written request for notification of the exact language of the statements.

(3) A person dissatisfied with the statements may appeal to the superior court of Thurston county within five days of the filing date. A copy of the petition and a notice of the appeal must be served on the secretary of state and the attorney general. The court shall examine the measure, the statements, and objections, and may hear arguments. The court shall render its decision and certify to and file with the secretary of state a statement it determines will meet the requirements of this chapter, and within the timelines identified by the secretary of state.

The decision of the superior court is final, and its statement is the established explanatory statement. The appeal must be heard without costs to either party.

[ 2015 c 171 s 1; 2009 c 415 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 804. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.81.230.]